src/scripts/Albanian/stress.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# The rules here assume they are given a grapheme word as input.

# check for nouns, and mark stress as per rules if not stressed.
#source Nouns;

# check for verb-endings which are not penult stressed

# if no stress marks go for 
source alphabet.foma 

#on final vowel if it is not a schwa

define fullV  gV - ë;
define endsU  {ull} | {ullt} | {ulla} | {ur}  | {ura} | {urit} | {et} | {ëve};
define noStress [grapheme - StressMark]+;
define stressMarkFullVowel [0:StressMark] [fullV|{ue}|{ye}|{ua}];
define stressMarkVowel [0:StressMark] [gV|{ue}|{ye}|{ua}];

define finalVowelStressRule  
 stressMarkFullVowel @-> ||  .#. [noStress]* _  [gC]+ gV .#. ; # penult if open vowel ending

define specialEndingStressRule 
 stressMarkFullVowel @-> ||  .#. [noStress]* _  [gC]+ endsU .#. ,,  # penult if ending -ur-ull -ura(fem adj??)
 i:[StressMark i] -> ||  .#. [noGStress]* _  n .#. ;

define adjectivalStressRule 
 [u ->  [StressMark u] || .#. [noStress]* _ e s .#. ] .o.
 [ [0:StressMark] i ->  || .#. [noStress]* e s _ .#. ] .o.   #  es`i
 [stressMarkFullVowel @-> || .#. [noStress]* _ [gC]+ [{ëse}|{ësit}] .#. ] ;
 

define finalConsonantStressRule 
 stressMarkFullVowel @-> ||  .#. [noStress]* _  [gC]+ .#. ;  # final if consonant endig

define endingVowelStressRule  
 stressMarkFullVowel @-> ||  .#. [noStress]* ë [gC]+ _ .#. ;  
define penultimateStress 
  stressMarkVowel @-> || .#. [noStress]* _ [gC]* gV [gC]*  .#. ;  # penultimate

define anyStress 
  stressMarkVowel @-> || .#. [noStress]* _ [gC]*  .#. ;  # first one from the end

# heuristics
define nounHeuristics 
 [ i -> {`i} || .#. [noStress]* [ç|{xh}]  _ [u|{un}|{ut}] .#. ] .o.   # -ç`i often the sing indef of a male professional of some kind 
 [ i -> {`i} || .#. [noStress]* [{ës}|{gj}|{krac}|{ark}|{shtr}{stri}] _ .#. ] .o.   #  ësi, gji, arki kraci shtri endings
 [ stressMarkFullVowel @-> || .#.  [noStress]* _ [gC]+ [{ave}|{eve}|{ash}|{eje}|{at}] .#. ] ; # noun inflections

define regularStressRules 
 nounHeuristics 
 .o. specialEndingStressRule 
 .o. adjectivalStressRule 
 .o. finalVowelStressRule
 .o. finalConsonantStressRule
 .o. endingVowelStressRule
 .o. penultimateStress 
 .o. anyStress
;

source verbs.foma
source nouns.foma
source unstressed_words.foma

define markStress 
  nonStress 
	.o. nounStress 
	.o. verbStress .o. regularStressRules;
